Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 10 Liability of Companies for Damages
Generally

Cross references.

Liability of railroad employers for injuries to employees, §

34-7-40

et seq.

Measure of damages for wrongs and injuries by railroad companies generally, §

46-1-2

.

46-8-290.
Liability of railroad companies and their officers, agents, and employees for injuries to individuals and for damage or destruction of property generally.

In all cases where an individual is injured, or his property damaged or destroyed, by the carelessness, negligence, or improper conduct of any railroad company or an officer, agent, or employee of such company, in or by the running of the cars or engines of the company, such company shall be liable to pay damages to anyone whose person or property may be so injured, damaged, or destroyed, notwithstanding any bylaws, rules, regulations, or notices which may be made, passed, or given by such company and which purport to limit the company’s liability.

History.

Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 154, § 2; Code 1863, § 3280; Code 1868, § 3292; Code 1873, § 3368; Code 1882, § 3368; Civil Code 1895, § 2320; Civil Code 1910, § 2779; Code 1933, § 94-702.

Law reviews.

For comment on Atlantic C.L.R.R. v. Dolan,

84 Ga. App. 734

,

67 S.E.2d 243

(1951), see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 349 (1952).

For article, “Actions for Wrongful Death in Georgia Part Three and Four,” see 21 Ga. B.J. 339 (1959).

46-8-291.
Consent and contributory negligence as defenses; comparative negligence as affecting amount of recovery.

No person shall recover damages from a railroad company for injury to himself or his property where the same is done by his consent or is caused by his own negligence, provided that if the complainant and the agents of the company are both at fault, the former may recover, but the damages shall be diminished by the jury in proportion to the amount of fault attributable to him.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2979; Code 1868, § 2980; Code 1873, § 3034; Code 1882, § 3034; Civil Code 1895, § 2322; Civil Code 1910, § 2781; Code 1933, § 94-703.

Law reviews.

For comment on Aycock v. Callaway,

78 Ga. App. 219

,

51 S.E.2d 53

(1948), see 11 Ga. B.J. 495 (1949).

For article discussing defenses to action for wrongful death in Georgia, see 22 Ga. B.J. 459 (1960).

For comment discussing Georgia’s comparative negligence laws in light of Maki v. Frelk, 85 Ill. App. 2d 439, 229 N.E.2d 284 (1967), see 19 Mercer L. Rev. 486 (1968).

For note “Plaintiff’s Last Clear Chance and Comparative Negligence in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 47 (1969).

For article, “Reappraising the Jury’s Role as Finder of Fact,” see 20 Ga. L. Rev. 123 (1985).

46-8-292.
Proof of injury from running of train as prima-facie evidence of lack of reasonable skill and care.

In all actions against railroad companies for damages to persons or property, proof of injury inflicted by the running of locomotives or cars of such companies shall be prima-facie evidence of the lack of reasonable skill and care on the part of the servants of the companies in reference to such injury.

History.

Ga. L. 1929, p. 315, § 1; Code 1933, § 94-1108.

Law reviews.

For comment on Atlantic C.L.R.R. v. Dolan,

84 Ga. App. 734

,

67 S.E.2d 243

(1951), see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 349 (1952).